Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.376

[Art. 38] Duties of trial counsel and defense counsel.

(1) The trial counsel of a general or special court-martial shall prosecute in the name of the state, and shall, under the direction of the court, prepare the record of the proceedings.

(2) The accused has the right to be represented in his or her defense before a general or special court-martial or at an investigation under RCW 38.38.316 as provided in this subsection.

(a) The accused may be represented by civilian counsel if provided at his or her own expense.

(b) The accused may be represented by:

(i) Military counsel detailed under RCW 38.38.260; or

(ii) Military counsel of his or her own selection if that counsel is reasonably available, as determined under regulations prescribed under subsection (3) of this section.

(c) If the accused is represented by civilian counsel, military counsel detailed or selected under (b) of this subsection shall act as associate counsel unless excused at the request of the accused.

(d) Except as provided under (e) of this subsection, if the accused is represented by military counsel of his or her own selection under (b)(ii) of this subsection, any military counsel detailed under (b)(i) of this subsection shall be excused.

(e) The accused is not entitled to be represented by more than one military counsel. However, the person authorized under regulations prescribed under RCW 38.38.260 to detail counsel in his or her sole discretion:

(i) May detail additional military counsel as assistant defense counsel; and

(ii) If the accused is represented by military counsel of his or her own selection under (b)(ii) of this subsection, may approve a request from the accused that military counsel detailed under (b)(i) of this subsection act as associate defense counsel.

(3) The state judge advocate shall, by regulation, define "reasonably available" for the purpose of subsection (2) of this section and establish procedures for determining whether the military counsel selected by an accused under subsection (2) of this section is reasonably available.

(4) In any court-martial proceeding resulting in a conviction, the defense counsel:

(a) May forward for attachment to the record of proceedings a brief of such matters as he or she determines should be considered in behalf of the accused on review, including any objection to the contents of the record which he or she considers appropriate;

(b) Shall assist the accused in the submission of any matter under RCW 38.38.536; and

(c) May take other action authorized by this chapter.

(5) An assistant trial counsel of a general court-martial may, under the direction of the trial counsel or when qualified to be a trial counsel as required by RCW 38.38.260, perform any duty imposed by law, regulation, or the custom of the service upon the trial counsel of the court. An assistant trial counsel of a special court-martial may perform any duty of the trial counsel.

(6) An assistant defense counsel of a general or special court-martial may, under the direction of the defense counsel or when qualified to be the defense counsel as required by RCW 38.38.260, perform any duty imposed by law, regulation, or the custom of the service upon counsel for the accused.

[ 2009 c 378 s 17; 1989 c 48 s 37; 1963 c 220 s 40.]